Wow!
What a fantastic meal.
From start to finish the attention to detail was incredible.
The staff was well trained for the soft opening, the kitchen executed beautifully and Giada was in the house to see everything was up to par.
It did not disappoint!
Cocktails are well thought out and the Hannibal was a crowd favorite.
We sipped on those while we gazed over the huge selection of anti-pasta items.
It's a bit overwhelming to choose, because they all sound delicious, but eventually we decided the table would share the dates ($14), burrata ($12), orzo meatballs ($13), rollatini ($12) lobster arancini ($18), salami and cheese platter.
Bite after bite was utterly delicious.
However, the dates stood out as a favorite, like most these were sweet and salty, but what set them apart was the spice from the Italian sausage.
They had some serious kick, which I loved.
The aged parmesan from the platter was dreamy, as well.
Next, we shared a variety of pastas: Giada's signature spaghetti ($28), tortellini ($26), ravioli ($34), and farrotto ($26).
The spaghetti's simplicity really shines with a touch of lemon, basil and three jumbo shrimp.
The ravioli was delicate and filled with wonderful flavors from the lobster, asparagus, and tarragon.
The farrotto had a wonderfully chewy texture and earthy flavor from the morel mushrooms and distinct richness from the pecorino, we really enjoyed it.
The manager brought over an order of risotto ($30) for comparison.
It too was delicious, it oozed with bold seafood flavors from the crab and scallops.
You cannot go wrong.
We had already enjoyed a feast, but the main course was still to come.
We had the veal chop saltimbocca ($43), rack of lamb ($45), and Tuscan ribeye ($68).
The veal chop and the ribeye were straight from the Flintstones.
These were extremely large portions even for the heartiest of appetites.
Every bit of it was stellar.
The lemon potatoes were the perfect accompaniment.
They are smashed and fried and topped with cheese.
Meat and potatoes never tasted so good.
Dessert selections were chosen for us.
There was a trio of gelatos, the espresso and chocolate really stood out.
The banana was the least favorite.
Then, there were assorted cookies, tart and other pastries.
To cap it off they served a scrumptious nutella espresso that was simply sinful.
The dining room is gorgeous.
You can spot Giada's special touches all over.
The retractable windows are impressive though it got a bit warm when they were open.
The photobooth is fun and sets the mood for the playful evening that lies ahead.

Amazing all around!
What a beautiful restaurant!
The oysters Rockefeller and bacon wrapped dates are a must.
The lobster ravioli was excellent, it had a nice summery freshness to it.
The Conan "The Destroyer" Cocktail was amazing as well.
(You'll understand the name when you see the cocktail pictured on there iPad cocktail menu).
Our waiter Bryan who was from the Islands and clearly some type of culinary savant, did a superb job.
His knowledge of the food and especially the wine was astonishing.
Definitely a must try restaurant when in Vegas!

Wow.
The restaurant is decorated impeccably.
The view from the windows of the fountains at the Bellagio are awesome.
The Cromwell is a mix of the cosmopolitan and the Wynn having a baby.
But let's talk about the most incredible and delicious food.
Presentation,preparation,and service is all top notch.
Can't wait to go again.
Giada is as gorgeous in person as on tv.
She our did herself with the whole concept.
Not like most strip restaurants.
You don't walk in and see the bar.
You see an amazing display of food.
This restaurant is a must for all tourists and locals to experience

Had the pleasure of attending opening night at Giada.
Don't hesitate, make a reservation ASAP and enjoy this experience.
We enjoyed the charred octopus followed by the 7 ounce filet, salmon and asparagus.
Dessert was a tomato-strawberry torte.
We even got to meet Giada!
Pricey but worth every penny and then some.

Wow I think I just found my new favorite place to eat in vegas.
This place was unbelievably good.
From the great view of the strip to the fresh pasta and antipasto bar this was truly an experience.
We did the chefs tasting menu so we could sample one of everything and I've got to say there wasn't a food I didn't like on it.
Some of my favorites on the menu but not all of them cause that would take awhile to write down were the lemon spaghetti w/ shrimp, the salmon, pea tortellini, the bacon wrapped dates w/ sausage, fried potatoes w/ cheese and the trio of desserts.
Sounds like a lot but there was three of us so we sampled a little bit of each dish till the food was gone.
Living in vegas I will be back again and again.
Check this place out next time your going out to eat.
It won't disappoint you.

Went here for dinner last night....
The restaurant alone is beautiful!!!!
It was an absolute treat, from a long cocktail menu, delicious appetizer and a pretty good selection of entrée, the rack of lamb was delicious, lobster ravioli, oyster was soooo good and you gotta have the bacon wrap dates.

I've had the pleasure of dining at Giada twice already.
On both occasions the hostesses greeted us promptly and enthusiastically.
The restaurant itself is impeccable in design and the food and service do not disappoint either.
Memorable highlights were the Lemon Spaghetti and Grilled Octopus.
All of the pasta are handmade which is reflected in the quality.
I met Giada on my second visit and she was very warm and welcoming.
She said that the restaurant is an extension of her home - mission accomplished.
I highly recommend going with a group of friends and sampling a little bit of everything on the menu to truly experience and appreciate the restaurant.

Had the pleasure of attending a luncheon at Giada's just before it opened to the public.
The restaurant is beautiful with great views of the strip.
Service was great.
We sampled the antipasti platter, pea and pancetta tortellini, chicken cacciatore - all delish!
We even got to meet Giada herself - she was so personable and sincere.
Love every detail she has hand selected for her new spot!

What a gorgeous restaurant and the location is unbelievable.
Giada was smart to put her very first restaurant on the famous four corners of the strip!
The food was amazing, service outstanding and one beautiful place, thanks Giada for coming to Las Vegas!

Great service and beautiful Giada is in the house!
It is hard to describe how awesome Giada's new baby is!
From the moment we walked in the door, we were treated so warmly!
We arrived about an hour early to check out the bar.
Our lovely bartender gave us the interactive menu.
We went with Giada's favorite - The Destroyer with Azul Reposado and Basil.
Delicious and refreshing!
Our server was Valentino and yes, he lives up to his name sake!
He was assisted by awesome Joe.
Muuuuahhh - we love you both.
We started with Bacon Wrapped Dates with spicy Italian sausage & gorgonzola crema.
OMG!
Next was the Crispy Oysters Rockafeller with baby spinach bread crumbs & pancetta vinaigrette.
Delicious!
Our third appetizer was the Vitello Tonnato with veal loin, seared tuna, and caper aioli .
This was my favorite - the combination of the flavors was perfect!
They opened the windows.
The noise from the famous corner of Flamingo and LV Blvd actually added nicely to the atmosphere of the open dining room.
Before our main course, we were treated to a prosecco and St. Germain cocktail to cleanse our palates.
It was so delicious that I ordered one with Hendricks Gin!
My friend had the ravioli.
It was fantastic -  perfectly cooked pasta and filled with sweet lobster.
I had the Colorado (my fav) rack of lamb.
The lamb was perfect, melt in your mouth and not gamey at all.
The crunchy coating was delicious.
Our side was the asparagus with lemon ricotta.
Grilled perfectly!
For dessert, we had the three Tirimisu combo.
Heaven!
We order the Nutella coffee which was delicious!
Giada stopped by the table.
She is so amazing!
She hit the jackpot in Vegas with her first restaurant!
We are so lucky to have her!
Note: I want those dining room chairs - they are sooooo comfortable!

Dining at Giada's was such an amazing experience!
They offer a variety of traditional Italian dishes, also there is an antipasti bar located at the entrance of the dining room where you can see all the preparations of the bread, pastas and pizzas!
Upon seating we were greeted by the manager, Stephanie who was told us a nice introduction to the restaurant and also very helpful in giving suggestions of the cocktail menu.
Our server was very knowledgeable and gave great recommendations!
We ordered a variety of different appetizers and entrees and we enjoyed each and every dish!
Make sure you save room for dessert!
That was the best part ;).
The service was definitely on point, the server/runner/busser were all very attentive and my water was full all night!
The GM of the restaurant, Laurent was nice enough to stop by and made sure everything was to our liking, super awesome guy!
I definitely will be returning and recommending this place to all my family and friends :)

What can I say, Giada's new restaurant is one of a kind.
The interior is very open and adorned with light earthy tones.
Staff was very knowledgable and friendly, service was exceptional.
The food was simply amazing, must try's include the chicken, t-bone, and sea food.
All pasta is freshly made and amazing, we tried several dishes and all were cooked perfectly.

I visit Vegas for work and I've been the past 2 weeks.
I've been waiting for Giadas to open for a long while so I immediately tried to book a reservation.
The phone number listed never got me to a live person and when I tried to book online it pushed me out to July.
I thought I would just sit at the bar so I walked over twice and both times was told that I couldn't even walk up and see the place without a reservation.
I will write a new review once I get a chance to try the place.
Not impressed so far.
Give us some direction!!

What an amazing dining experience.
Every person from the busboy to the food runners to Giada herself were welcoming, gracious, and so knowledgable.
Food was incredible, the view is one of the best in Vegas, and the details in this restaurant are not lost on a diner.
We had an excellent time.
Get Giada's favorites for an antipasti and the cookie assortment for dessert.
Lemon spaghetti and the bone in ribeye were phenomenal too!

Absolutely amazing.
The tasting menu offered was all the items I wanted.
The dessert portion should have been three instead of six...   All delicious,  but I was so full on leaving the restaurant that i considered purging.
Please understand, I ate that much because it was so amazingly good.
The food was incredible.
The loan weak spot were the "breads".
A loan, crusty Italian loaf would have been better that the three bread offerings, which were good, but unnecessary.
The food was amazing though.
Giada was a gracious host and chef, and even more beautiful in real life if that is possible.
I had the lemon spaghetti (phenominal) and the lamb (amazing).
Tonight I tried to recreate the marscapone stuffed peppers.
Delicious.
Mine were not as good.
Radovich and Victor were phenomenal servers.
I love this place and will be back often!

I was extremely disappointed with Giada.
I was so excited for them to open, I checked their website almost obsessively.
When I found out that reservations were available on OpenTable, I made a reservation right away for the first time slot available (11 am on June 4th, made the res in early May).
I spent the next couple weeks obsessively looking for the menu and reading all of the news articles about this restaurant.
In one article, I noticed it said that they would not be open for lunch for the first month... this was a red flag for me, so I called the number provided to confirm that we would be able to go at the specified time.
I was assured over the phone that it was fine.
Great.
So we get to Vegas and I get a confirmation e mail from OpenTable for my res...
I am so excited, but still a little wary, so I went to the Cromwell's front desk to ask about our reservation... they don't know anything and give me the number of the restaurant (which isn't the number on their website).
I call... no answer.
I call several more times and finally get an answer.
I just wanted to triple check that my res is still good.... oh no, not open for lunch.
'You made your reservation when we THOUGHT we would be open for lunch, but then we decided we weren't going to be.
' WHAT?!?!
I had invested so much time and energy into going to this restaurant....
I drove to Vegas for this.
I could not believe it.
Not only that, but the manager, Nicole I think, was less than helpful.
First, they offered us a 5 o clock res for that night, which I snatched with renewed excitement... only to get a call back a couple minutes later saying that actually they couldn't give us that res since they had a private party until 730.
WHAT.
Let down all over again.
Who has a private event on their opening night?
I thought this was the night for the public.
At this point, the manager said she couldn't do anything for us, that we could 'try to come sit at the bar.
' Are you kidding me?
This was unbelievably ridiculous.
She couldn't even just save us a place at the bar considering they were the ones who messed up?
How hard do I need to work to give this place my business?
I think the worst part was if I hadn't been researching, I would have shown up for our res and no one would have been there... how crushing is that?
How many people did this happen to?
I hope this place works on its customer service because right now it is garbage.
That, and don't give out reservations you can't keep and never bother to call those people or contact those people to tell them that their reservation had been cancelled.
After this experience, I don't know that I will visit Giada in the future and I would be hesitant to recommend it to anyone else.
I know it's a new restaurant and all, but get your act together.

I went in for a mock service and was really pleasantly surprised.
I was shocked how nice the design and layout of the space was, the staff knew their stuff.
When entering Giada you will find an anti-pasta bar and a very cool bread station.
The service was great the drinks were amazing and our server was really on the ball.
I am now a fan of Giada and wish the team a very successful opening.
I look forward to entertaining guest's at the bar with small appetizers and craft cocktails.
Giada thanks for making a very sexy and attractive restaurant on the best corner of the Las Vegas Blvd.

Always had a big crush on #Giada.
Martin, Chris, & Joneal at the Bar were all outstanding!
Laurent's visit was an added bonus.
The corner of the bar is a favorite location for me, so that was perfect as well.
Peas and pancetta, chicken marsala meatballs outstanding and the wine selections are perfect!
Truly beautiful surroundings & great people.
I suspect that we will continue to read more, and find that the restaurant quickly becomes a necessary stop on even the shortest visits to #SinCity.
Can wait to return.

Giada's Clean decor & even better executed dining.
Perfect your Italian enunciation!
Sit at the window for the Bellagio fountain view.
Comp basil, and make sure you check the crocks at the bread station.
There's no question about it go with a friend, companion, cougar, groupie, sugar daddy or mommy.
The tasting menu sounds good, but one should order the spaghetti lemon basil concoction whilst the other orders the ribeye with a pregame anchovies and ask for the pea pesto.

Absolutely phenomenal.
Given the extreme hype my wife and I had high expectations, which would have been so hard to live up to - and Giada delivered.
Items selected:  - Lobster Arancini w/ calabrian chili pomodoro & basil aioli $18 - Pea Pesto Crostini, prosciutto san daniele $14 - Artichoke Soup w/ mint, tomato & focaccia croutons $11 - Tricolore gorgonzola, dates, walnuts & prosciutto $16 - Spaghetti w/ shrimp, lemon & basil $28 - Tortellini w/ pea pesto, pancetta & mint $26 - 7oz Filet w/ salsa verde & crispy polenta $42 - Trio of Tiramisu - peanut butter & jelly, chocolate, and blackberry lime $8  We realized that it's going to be too much for two, but really wanted to sample a little bit of everything and take home the rest in a box.
In a word, Giada's taste should be described as "light".
Or "lemon", as most of items above had some sort of citrus flavor.
Even from the lobster arancini and pea pesto crostini, we sensed fresh aroma of lemon, and it was amazing.
The contrast between the homemade spaghetti (light) and tortellini (rich) convinced us the versatileness of pasta dishes.
No simplistic marinara / alfredo are provisioned here at Giada, which is what exactly we'd expected.
And the Tricolore salad with gorgonzola, dates, walnuts and prosciutto... perfect balance of bitterness, sweetness and crunchiness.
By the time we get to the dessert we were completely full, but were unable to resist Tiramisu per the waiter's recommendation - glad we ordered!
It's a great idea for Las Vegas to have a fantastic restaurant like Giada at the most prestigious intersection on the strip - what can I say?
Life is good!

I just realized something- Folks... as tempting as it might be to tell everyone how amazing the meal is here-- we are only making it more difficult for ourselves to come back and get reservations next time.
Perhaps we should "modify" our reviews with more restraint so everyone doesn't catch on and swarm this place for the next 5 years?
You know... instead of 5 stars and phrases like, "OMG!
It was all so amazing!
" we could tone it down to... "uh...it' was okay, if you are into to awesome food and all that.
Meh.
I mean, sure it looked and tasted good, and the location was great... and Giada was gracious and lovely, but really... who cares about such things?
"  You know, add a tone of ennui to our reviews to keep everyone else away before we never get a chance to come back.
Just a thought.
By the way- the Vermentino goes excellent with the lemon shimp spaghetti, and the Leviathin red wine goes perfect with the lamb.
So-- back to my point- Stop promoting this place or we'll never be able to get a reservation.
Let's make this Las Vegas' best kept SECRET!
:-) Muhahahahahahaahaha!
*evil laugh* ...and keep it all to ourselves!

Went there for dinner with friends the service and food was wonderful.
Highly recommend tying this restaurant, one of the best in vegas.

My party of 4 were extremely excited to visit Giada on their 4th day open!
Giada was present and making the rounds...cool!
While we waited for our table, we started with a bit of coppa, bacon wrapped dates, and charred octopus.
All delicious items!
Drinks were imaginative, tasty, and stiff.
Once we were seated at the table, it went south.
We ordered 3 pasta dishes, 2 mains,  a side, and a bottle of wine.
the Sommelier was awesome and choose a great burgundy, but the food...it just never came.
30 mins into the bottle of wine, the server checked and said there was problem and it would be out shortly...Another 20 mins and a second bottle wine...no food.
Finally after an hour,  a chicken makes an appearance (no pasta yet) with a bit of flourish, disappears for carving and doesn't come back.
It's like they were teasing us!
Well we waited for another 10 mins but unfortunately we had a show to catch at 10PM and after 2 1/2 hours at Giada, we only had apps/alcohol to fill our bellies.
The manager was gracious and comp'd our 2 bottles of wine and apps, but couldn't make right our disappointment or rumbling stomachs during the show.
Hopefully this was just opening jitters as it was the first Friday night they were serving dinner.
Really wished I could of tried more of their food....

Ok, so we went right back...cuz it was THAT good the first visit a day and a half before.
We were welcomed like regulars for a late seating.
Walked right by the bar after the presentation by our hostess and saw Chris at the bar so we gave a shout out (I'd been up at the BeachClub for a bit :-) and, at that very moment we got one back from Laurent as we entered the dining room.
Pretty amazing, that this team is so strong in the front of the house, recognising & treating visitors like regulars.
We were quickly ushered to table #44 (awesome,) and ordered our wine, the dates wrapped in bacon, and the Bur-rata...both superb.
The bread service with the piping hot house focaccia is unique and worth waiting for.
Unfortunately, :-( lobster ravs got 86'd (it was eleven,) so we got the tortellini and the Salmon.
The fish was seasoned/cooked to perfection and I could eat a bowl of the succotash (it was so fresh and delish.
) Tortellini with peas was also a definite "ordering it again.
"  David was a superhero...top-notch, and was joined by Martin.
I'm now committed to trying EVERYTHING on the menu!
Do go.
#extraordinary

This place is great!
It was a little out of our element, but being a fan I wanted to check if out.
Our server was very helpful, friendly and knowledgeable.
He made some great recommendations and knew what he was talking about, which is helpful.
He first brought an iPad to browse some starter items, but its response time was fairly slow so it was a bit on the useless side.
I saw others a little befuddled by it as well.
The a la carte menu had lots to choose from.
Many options for everyone.
I chose the salmon and was not disappointed at all.
It was cooked to perfection and the sauce was great.
The bread board was fantastic and has all unique items like crunchy bread sticks, and a lemony bread loaf as well as some crispy flat bread.
Everything has an Italian name to it, obviously, so I don't quite recall them, but the squid and shrimp starter was fantastic as well  Overall, this was a great dining experience with a great view of the Bellagio.
I definitely recommend this place to anyone interested in a unique dining experience.

GIADA is the newest upscale restaurant in the middle of the Las Vegas Strip.
The atmosphere and decor is exceptional.
A great view of the center of the strip is seen from almost every seat in the restaurant.
Weather permitting the large windows swing out giving an unobstructed view of LV Blvd and Flamingo Rd (the heart of the strip).
The food was outstanding (many distinctive tastes) with an abundant variety.
On entering the restaurant, one receives a tour through an array of the foods that will be available on the menu.
Both food selection, delivery and service was excellent.
I can't wait until the next time to visit this new "winner"

I was expecting a lot from this place, but got disappointed.
I guess what can I expect when she fires her chef the week before opening.
the food is very expensive and way too fancy.
she is trying too hard.
if she wasn't a tv celeb this place would have no chance.

Let me preface this review with some commentary on a local "critic's", well, I guess, "pre-emptive" review in which he basically denounced all things Giada, pretty much predicated on her fame.
I'd suggest the real motive behind it is her fame and his lack thereof, at least beyond the usual, incestual, self-aggrandizing LV "foodie" circles.
My guess is he got to meet her (probably about three bottles into an early afternoon, knowing him) at any one of a half dozen food/ wine bacchanals across the U.S. and failed to impress her with his LV notoriety.
On to the subject at hand- the eponymous Giada at the re-opened and renovated Cromwell (formerly Bills, nee The Barbary Coast).
While my not-so-esteemed hobby-critic non-professional is correct in his observance that the very affable Ms. de Laurentiis has never operated a restaurant, she does have a very real passion for food that her experience on the Food Network has translated into a somewhat new breed of culinary experience.
As for how that translates into a commercial culinary operation, well, based on my experience, she's got the bulk of it figured out.
Back to that later...  As far as the experience went, the room's very much like its namesake- beautiful, but not in the glamorous sense that pervades all things Vegas, more along the lines of the girl-next-door.
Bright and airy, with clean lines, uncluttered space, and sparing us of overly-retro/ ironic furnishings and paint schemes, it's simply a breath of fresh air.
The only knock here is the hokey "tour" of the counter space that fronts the open space of the kitchen.
Better to let waiting guests explore on their own and have friendly staff ask them if they have any questions with an appropriate table-side follow up, which, based on the service I received, would be proficiently, if not charmingly, executed.
Beverage-wise (and all great meals' first course, IS a beverage, preferably somewhat strong drink), this place is in very capable mixological hands.
My table sampled several of the cocktails which covered a broad spectrum of tastes and ingredients.
Well-balanced and elegantly presented, they formed a great flavor canopy under which we stretched out, relaxed, and perused the bill of fare.
Which, with much confidence, our server, whose name has, for the moment escaped me, handled ably as my dining companion proceeded to order from both sides of the menu (the left side being more small plate/ anti-pasti driven, while the right side features larger, heartier dishes), in the manner of a SWAT officer range-testing a new automatic weapon.
As we awaited the various plates arrival, our sommelier approached.
I informed her of the myriad and sundry plates on their way from the kitchen, and when she asked, "Do you want to go red or white?
" , my response, hedonist that I wish I to be,  was, both.
As dishes arrived and were placed upon the table family style with well-enunciated descriptions, she returned with both, and they were perfect.
A medium-light bodied white and similar red with bright acidity to keep flavors flowing and the flavors did just that- flowed deliciously.
This is fresh, just off the garden style cooking, reminiscent of backyard-dining at family gatherings.
Except this was Italian, unlike my family's tendency to flame-roasted flesh, potatoes, and fresh peas, regardless of season.
Well, maybe the fresh peas regarded the season...
Anyway, from the charred octupus to arancini, the flavors were bright and straight-forward.
The only miss was a soup that I'm quite sure had been the result of an improperly followed recipe.
Call it the vulnerable moment that endeared me as I was happily overwhelmed by layers of excellence.
As the large plates arrived, I again beckoned the sommelier and asked her help along the same criteria, albeit with some bolder flavors and richer options, none of which missed the mark.
I might add, she accomplished all of this with by-the-glass offerings.
An aside- here's the true mark of a wine program- you should find every pairing you need for everything on the menu on their BTG list.
It's really not all that hard.
Anyway, the star of all those plates, and by "star" I mean Alpha Centauri compared to Vega, was the Lemon Spaghetti.
Perfectly cooked, perfect texture, perfectly balanced, it resulted in much discussion at our table about our own recipes for such and a "throw-down" challenge, of which I am a part.
I look forward to repeated research outings here...  Dessert too, was comfortable, fresh, and uncomplicated- a selection of great gelatos and some amazing chocolate cookies rounded it all out.
Which brings me back to my point about this being Ms. de Laurentiis' first go- it's all about passion and professionalism, only one of which can be learned, but both can be hired.
This place is in very capable hands...

Have to wait a little for your table?
No Problem, they have a cute little photobooth!!!
This place screams out Giada!
From the moment you walk up the second floor to when we walked and were explained about each different prep stations I was quite impressed.The design is very cute and clean and I think it represents Giada to the tee.
We came on their 6th day of opening the service was EXCELLENT.
Our server Radoslav was really attentive and good at explaining the menu though it was quite lengthly.
He explained that the portions are designed to be small so that you can try many things on the menu.
My boyfriend and I had to beg to differ.
We ordered 2 plates too many but they were all tasty.
I did not know what to really expect but I was PLEASANTLY surprised.
Here is what we ordered:  Drinks: La Strada: Campari, homemade lemon sorbeto, berognoli limoncello, prosecco         very good, pretty and on the fruity side Riso Amaro: cucumber, celery bitters, 2nite vodka, fresh grapefruit and lemon          pretty, fruity but on the too much of the bitter side for me  Appetizers: Bacon Dates: very tasty, just the right amount of crisp on the bacon Octopus: lacking a little salt, the only dish i wouldn't order again Arugula Salad: simple but yet very refreshing  Entre: Tortellini: if you don't like peas you probably wont like this dish but i thought it was very good Spaghetti: PERFECTION.
BY FAR MY FAVORITE DISH.
spaghetti and all pasta dishes are made in house.
this dish was so refreshing and was just perfect with the large shirmps.
I WANT MORE!!!
Filet: cut of meat was very good and cooked to perfection Side Corn: with a kick of spicyness and charr.
We had no room for desert but did have the Espresso Nocciol and Lemoncello Berta for a drink after our meal.
The Espresso Nocciol was velvet in my mouth.
SOOO good.
it has nutella in it.
Need i say more??
The Lemoncello was a nice palate cleanser  Overall I would HIGHLY recommend that you try Giada.
If you call and try to make reservations you might not be able to get the reservation but if you walk in and have a small party i'm sure they can accommodate you.
Rumor is that they are "fully committed" until October.
I almost forgot the VIEW!!!!!
Giada in located in the new Cromwell Hotel.
She totally lucked out the the view.
because its just beautiful up there with the view of the strip.
Good lLuck and Good Eats.

This is my updated review.
My first review was based on the terrible reservation process.
This review is if the food and experience.
Wow!
Wow!
Wow!
What a meal me had a Giada's.
The food and drink was incredible.
We ordered the shrimp and calamari as an appetizer.
The calamari was so fresh tasting and it wasn't overly breaded.
There were only two small shrimp but the calamari was the showcase.
I ordered the Hannibal for my drink.
This rum cocktail was delicious and the perfect size.
For my main course I had the lemon shrimp spaghetti!!!
I'm from the Gulf Coast of Florida and these really were the biggest shrimp I've ever had.
The noodles and shrimp were cooked perfectly.
If I could pick it apart a little, I wish there was more sauce on the noodles.
I little dry for my liking.
I posted pictures as well.

Wow.
Everything here is thoughtfully done, from the floor to the ceiling, the starters through dessert.
Giada's statement - immortalized in the light fixtures - "I eat a little bit of Everything and not a lot of Anything" is the guiding principle here.
We tried a medium sized starter, Giada's choice.
Every bite was amazing.
All of the crostini were to die for.
The rack of lamb was perfect, as were all the pastas we tried.
We will be returning.

The entrance to this place is very confusing for the guess and if you don't have reservations forget about going in, even to sit at the bar you need reservations, it's so stupid and the manager and hostess won't even tell how long to get a table, they'll just tell you is going to be a long time.
Lol it's crazy.

So glad Giada chose Vegas for her first restaurant, we welcome her with open arms!
This is as good as it gets for a true foodie, and the view and ambiance just add to the great experience.
Couple of suggestions: if you go as a group of 4 or more, order a bunch of aps, salads and throw in a few micro pizzas (but pass on mortadella pizza, it was only average), every item offers a different taste, one as good as the next.
Then pick a pasta to share, the portion size will be relatively small, but good to share as you still need to get to the main course.
We had the pasta in a light sauce with 2 jumbo shrimp, I think it is her signature pasta, it is heavenly, and the T-bone is cut into slices at the table and it is one of the largest cuts of beef I've ever seen served, should be shared by the whole table.
Throw a fish dish in, and you have it pretty well covered, but leave room for a bite of dessert, they are all excellent.
Top end wine list, recommend those in the Rioja section.
Recommend bringing some sort of coverup for the ladies as it was quite cold where we sat.
But that didn't diminish an incredible dining experience.
It's going to cost you some cash, but most of the great things in life do.

OMG!!!!!!!
I'am a ridiculous foodie and this is ridiculously good.
Besides my wife, I've never tasted such good food ever!!
Ok, pricey but it's sooooo good!

Very nice.
Got the whole chicken and some dates wrapped in bacon and sausage along with crispy polenta.
Service was great.
Kind of pricey but hey it's Vegas...

Wonderful food and service!
We dined early (before 6) and Giada was present, flitting from table to table and keeping a watchful eye on the front of the house.
My wife had the Pasta Fagioli soup, while I opted for the Tricolore Gorgonzola salad.
Both were absolutely wonderful.
We shared a small antipaste, which included tuna crostini with pickle, bacon wrapped dates, and grilled sweet baby peppers stuffed with goat cheese...delightful!
My entree was Rigatoni with a tasty vegetable bolognese...its flavor profile was surprisingly intense (in a very good way).
My wife's Salmon filet was perfectly cooked, and our side of sweet corn with sausage had a nice kick to it that would have made Bobby Flay proud.
We were too full to consider desert...maybe next time.
Only a couple of nits to pick...the antipasti/drink menu was on an ipad, which was entirely unnecessary...stick to traditional menus unless you enjoy watching those over 50 fumble around with them.
One of our paper menus had a grease spot that prominently marred the entree selections...no excuse for that.
One of our chairs wobbled badly...I had to reach for another to replace it...this sort of thing has no place in an upscale venue.
We will return in a few months, and leave room for desert.

OMG, if there was ever a reason to give a restaurant a perfect 10, then Giada gets it!
THIS IS MY VEGETARIAN DREAM!
Through all of my travels around the world and back, Giada of the most fantastic restaurants I've ever experienced, hands down.
From ambiance to food to service, no detail has gone unnoticed.
I'll start by saying that this restaurant is a ray of light in the dark underground-esque-walk-through-a-casino restaurant scenes in Vegas.
As soon as you enter the space, you're greeted by the aroma of delicious food, an antipasti bar, a wood burning oven, cooks in the kitchen and food & friendliness all the way round.
It's like walking into Giada's personal kitchen!
Then, after checking in with the host, you'll walk into the dining room to find a GORGEOUS, sexy, ambient-lit space with a killer view of the Bellagio and that part of the strip (mind you, you're several floors up and the restaurant faces the Strip).
You'll get an interactive cocktail and drink menu, from which I would HIGHLY recommend starting with one of Giada's signature cocktails.
I already forgot what I had, but it's a refreshing summery whisky something.
OK, now I'm getting onto the food, which is still calling my name days later!
The first and foremost delicious thing:  they start with a freshly baked crucible (?
) of focaccia bread, fully loaded on the side with any topping you would need.
For your courses, You gotta go for a little of everything.
It's all meant to be shared.
So I'll ramble off some of what I had...the compilation vegetable plate, flatbreads, a side of potatoes, two types of vegetarian pastas and DESSERTS.
Cookies are a must, especially the lemon Ricotta, one of my fondest memories.
Then try the polenta cake.
It has a delectable strawberry topping with a dollop of cream.
MMMM HMMM.
****FINALLY:  Can I just give a shout-out to my server Nathan and our Sommellier (I forgot her name).
They were just so stellar and they're the kind of people you'd want to invite to your house to have dinner, chat, and treat really well b/c of how nice they treated you.
REALLY FIRST CLASS!!!
*******  I gotta go back to Vegas in a month for round 2 so more to come then...

Thoroughly enjoyed our night at Giada's.
Had our fair share of courses: the Caldo App, Arugula Salad, the Spaghetti and Assorted Cookies.
We talked about how every flavor was so lite and clean and very Italian.
The Gelato/Sorbetto dessert & the Lemon Ricotta Cookie my have been the most memorable things of the night (though we are dessert freaks:) The entire meal was fabulous.
And keep your eyes open!
We literally almost ran Giada over while being seated; none of us were paying attention:)    Really fun to see the boss on the floor!

Honestly not sure how this place is holding up with 4 star reviews on yelp because our dining experience was totally disappointing.
The place is real nicely designed so props for not screwing up one of the best views on the strip.
We had a party of 7 for my engagement celebration, checked in and got the grand tour before we were seated.
Decided it would be best to order a little bit of everything, from the chicken meatballs to prosciutto and something else that wasn't worth remembering.
Chicken meatballs were pretty dry and flavorless.
However the mushrooms they were stacked were pretty tasty.
The items on the drink menu were pretty good.
For the main course I had the rack of lamb and my fiancé went with the filet.
Rack of lamb was dryer than the chicken meatballs were which tells me that they had no clue how to cook or prepare lamb.
Now the sad part was that my girls filet was super dry, over cooked and basically not a good cut.
Our friends went with with porterhouse which was decent, some others got the lemon spaghetti and another pasta dish.
Ended the dinner  with the strawberry shortcake type dessert that was bleh, cookies were pretty good with the espresso.
Now despite the crappy food the place is real nice and I don't really mind that it sucked because we can't judge til we try it right?
Being Vegas I would probably not go back because honestly Italian food is pretty bland in my opinion and there's always new places to try in Vegas.
The only real bad part of the experience was that they ended up charging me and extra $260.
After I called the next day and spoke to the general manager he informed me that they were having problems and that his financial dept will take care of it.
Said I will have a call back the next day and that if I don't hear back to give them a call.
I've followed up and still can't get this issue cleared up which is a little annoying.
Hopefully this review will motivate them to take a closer look at their dishes and also fix the error on my check!

Amazing restaurant with amazing service!!
Great food and it has a great view of the strip.
Love this place!

Loved everything from the decor, to the staff, to--of course--the food.
The restaurant was bright (great natural light and light linens) and well decorated.
The windows were open, which was surprisingly nice for June in Vegas.
The wait staff was delightful.
Brian was our main server and he was great.
We had several apps.
All were good.
The mussels were very good.
I had the arugula salad which had a tasty dressing (a little sweet though, which I wasn't expecting).
I also had the filet which was cooked med well and I ordered med ...
But it was still excellent.
Buttery sauce to die for.

Came here with my girlfriend who is a huge Giada fan and had been talking about her new restaurant for months.
We started with the marinated calamari that was cool and refreshing in the Las Vegas heat, and the charred octopus that was so tender and made even better by sprinkling the Provided finishing salt over top.
We also had to order the salumi with hints of truffle that was also amazing.
For the main entree we had the whole roasted chicken cacciatore.
It was the Best roasted chicken I've ever had!
Perfectly crispy skin yet juicy meat that wasn't over cooked.
The seasoning was spot on as well.
Every bite was full of flavor!
The wait staff and even the managers were attentive and went out of their way to make our dining experience special, which says a lot about Giada's attention to detail.
It was such an enjoyable experience that we didn't want to rush.
We took over 3 hours savoring every mouthful and will definitely be back!

I am going to keep this short so people will read it.
This is simply one of the best dining experiences I ever had.
Keep in mind I love Italian food and have eaten in many Italian restaurants as well as worked in one.
I had the bacon dates, charred octopus, lemon spaghetti, and ribeye.
Nothing was over the top yet they each had a unique flavor that set them apart from similar dishes I have tried in the past.
The drinks and service were on point and the decor was simply amazing.
Giada hit it out of the park with her first restaurant.
100% worth a visit if you are making a trip to Vegas, nothing more to be said.

Confession, Giada is hands down my favorite celebrity chef.
So when I found out that she was opening her first restaurant I was super excited to try it.
A friend is visiting Vegas and wanted to check out The Linq.
We had already had dinner so we decided it was still a great opportunity to check out Giada for a few drinks.
The restaurant was beautiful with lots of attention to detail.
And that's where the good ended.
We walked right past the hostess stand since they looked busy amongst themselves.
We figured we just wanted to grab a drink at the bar so we didn't bother interrupting the hostesses talking to each other.
Once we got inside one of the hostesses came up to us and asked if we had a reservation, so we told her we just wanted to get some drinks at the bar.
Apparently there is such a thing as a waitlist for the bar (keep in mind it wasn't even full.
) We were told that if we gave them our phone number they would call us in about 20-25 minutes once something opens up.
Guess what?
They never called!!!!
To say we were disappointed with the level of service and professionalism would be an understatement.
Really it's just plain rude.
I guess it's my fault for expecting that a restaurant of someone who seems so down to earth would be so unwelcoming.
Giada, thanks to your staff you have lost a longtime fan.
It wasn't a total loss though, luckily we found the Bound by Salvatore bar at the casino level of the Cromwell.
Great service and super delicious cocktails!!

I am a huge Giada fan, and this restaurant blew my mind.
The service, food, ambiance, just everything WOW'd me....
I can't wait to go back.
As you take the escalator up, you feel like you're being transported to Giada's home.
The greeters were very friendly and if you look to the left, there is a little room... That's a cool little photo booth where you can take pictures.
So cool!!!!
As you walk in you're greeted by an Anti-Pasto bar.
Ovens from Italy are baking fresh focaccia bread and mini pizzettes, all delicious.
The bar is sleek and sexy and the lounge is spacious.
The dining room is quite large but intimate at the same time.
Tables are spaced out so that each table is secluded.
I hate restaurants that pack as many tables as they possibly can into one space.
Retractable windows open to overlook Bellagio, Caesars and LV Blvd.
If you're lucky you can see the dancing fountains.
The food is what I came here for and all of it was light, fresh, full of simple flavors but at the same time refined and elegant.
Grilled Broccoli Rabe w/ calabrian chili vinaigrette: Served at room temperature.
Grilled perfectly, but a little too spicy for my taste.
Rollatini - ricotta stuffed Eggplant & pomodoro: Hot dish and the pomodoro was fresh.
The cheese was delicious.
My favorite out of the two antipasto dishes.
Orzo Meatballs w/ parmesan pomodoro: She had these at the Bon Appetite event and they were even better at the restaurant.
The orzo makes them light and the sauce was delicious.
Bacon Wrapped Dates w/ spicy Italian sausage & gorgonzola crema: I have had these before at Firefly and thought the ones at Firefly were good, but these Bacon Wrapped Dates at Giada just blew those ones out of the water.
Fritto Misto, shrimp & calamari w/ shaved fennel & lemon aioli: Perfectly fried and seasoned....
The ailoi gives it a fresh richness.
Artichoke Soup w/ mint, tomato & focaccia croutons: Creamy, fresh, light, crunchy....   Tortellini with pea pesto, pancetta & mint: This was one of my favorite dishes.
The pasta is made in-house over at the antipasto station.
The filling was creamy and seasoned perfectly.
The lemon butter gave it that rich freshness.
I loved how it wasn't too heavy even though it had the lemon butter.
28 oz Bone in Tuscan Rib-Eye finished w/ lemon, a sunny side up egg & arugula: My friends got this dish and they loved it.
7oz Filet w/ salsa verde & crispy polenta: The polenta was kind of dry and the weakest component of any dish I had the whole evening.
The salsa verde was very unique and the red wine butter melted over my steak beautifully.
At the end of the meal I had a latte with orange syrup, and a dusting of Giada's signature and it was one of the best lattes I have ever had.
Dessert was a sampling and the lemon ricotta cookie was light any tart and had the perfect amount of frosting/icing.
The PB & J tiramisu was so unique and equally as delicious.
Overall, the experience I had a Giada's was mind-blowing.
It's definitely not cheap by any means...
But, if you're looking to have a one-of-a-kind dining experience with some of the best views in town from one of the biggest celebrity chefs... Then go to Giada.

I keep asking myself if this wasn't Giada's restaurant would it still be so hyped about or receiving such high reviews?
IMHO - YES and YES!
The ambiance is wonderful, everyone is attentive and warm without service feeling too in your face (or fake).
Open layout, feels very "homey".
I really hope they can keep up the good work.
One of the best celebrity chef restaurants we've been to.
On to the food - would order the burrata, calabrese, pea and prosciutto crostini, and lemon spaghetti again.
Such simple beautiful flavors!
I so appreciated the homemade pasta.
Perfection.
I don't think I can have any other than homemade pasta anymore.
We also had Giada's favorites antipasti; wouldn't order this again, some antipasti were just ehh.
Cocktails and after dinner drinks were yum.
Desserts will eventually be on a cart wheeled around.
I think that's such a great idea since you'll be able to see what is being offered.
They will also be open for breakfast and lunch - can't wait to see what kinds of things will be on the menu then!
Overall amazing experience.
Hubs is still raving about it!
Can't wait to go back....

Wow, impressed and doubly impressed that it is by a celebrity chef.
All reviews from celeb places are "ugh, really overrated".
Well done...service, food, atmosphere, view, price point.
Kudos and I am sometimes hard to impress.
We were under $200 for a party of four.
We ordered the Chicken Meatballs, which were good, but I wouldn't order again, just because nothing special...everything else was special.
Really everyone couldn't agree on a better app.
Entrees...filet and lamb chops....the temperature and flavor on both of these were beyond excellent.
The lemon shrimp pasta...excellent.
The barley entree was good, but I am just not a huge barley fan.
The bread basket was served with this piping hot rosemary buttery bread in an oven hot baking dish.
Butter had lemon zest and dipping oil was flavored as well.
Desserts deserve big kudos.
The strawberry polenta cake was a take on strawberry shortcake, but it held the integrity of the original, but was set apart and creative and fresh.
Very hard thing to do with a traditional recipe.
The jam, the cake....delish.
The tiramisu trio were excellent as well.
Sides....the corn/sausage was very unique and I enjoyed thoroughly.
Others thought too spicy, but never for me....could have used less sausage, only because I am not huge on sausage and would rather have more corn.
Thought the combo was unique and the sauce was excellent.
The polenta cakes were excellent as well.
Crispy on outside, creamy on inside.
Service was beyond excellent.
Waiter was spot on, funny, attentive, informative.
View of strip and bellagio fountains.
Four stars.
Attention to detail in design and layout, four stars.
Beautiful glassware, awesome silver ware.
Presentation...delivered....food quality....delivered.....price point....good for upscale dining.
I only somewhat knew Giada as a celeb chef with some food network shows.
Definitely a fan now.
Oh, and I had read in the review that her grandfather was a movie director and that her family also owned a pasta factory before WWII.
Her grandfather's movie posters were presented as art in the entrance.
Classy and true to a good heart....family first always.
The walk through of the kitchen and antipasti bar was also a nice touch.

I really was blown away by it all - outstanding dining experience.
We took our time - had an extended 3 hour dinner from antipasto to after dinner drink.
When we first got off the escalator, there were about 20 girls standing at the front door to greet us which was a little overwhelming, but that is just about the closest thing to a negative I can find.
Great service, amazing food.
Try to get a window seat if you're there after dark - great views.
My husband and I had the salumi antipasto, romaine salad, shrimp spaghetti, lobster ravioli and spicy corn sausage.
Every bite was amazing.
Fred was our waiter and he's fantastic.
Can't wait to go back!

The service was excellent!!
Our waiter was great, the manager checked on our table and even Giada herself.
When we walked out, other servers pleasantly invited us back.
That alone will bring me back next time I'm in Vegas.
The food was good, I got the rigatoni and was satisfied.
Others in my party loved their food.
I would have opted for the spaghetti next time.
I loved my drink - 'la strada.
' Downsides - There was a lot of time between courses and drinks, as in we were there for 3 hours.
We did not feel rushed at all which was nice, but we had arrived by a very, very early flight that morning and I would have been fine shaving an hour off that time.
The hostesses were horrible.
There were about 6 of then behind the desk when we arrived and they barely greeted us except to ask about a reservation which we did have.
They pointed us to the photo booth and did not look or talk to us for the next 20-30 minutes while we waited.
They also did not say a word to us when we walked out which after such amazing service by the entire wait staff was really disappointing.
Overall, I would definitely recommend it!

Omg this reataurant was GORGEOUS.
Entrance to Giada was amazing, and the interior was bright and had amazing views of the strip.
Staff was extremely friendly and it was easy to tell they were really proud to work there.
Here's what I ordered:  Hannibal: it was like a tiny fishbowl!
Boyfriend enjoyed this drink   Raspberry nectar agave iced tea: omg cutest and fanciest presentation ever!
MUST GET THIS!
The nectar liquid sugar was so good!!!
Bread: presentation was so cute and so Giada!
Loved the lemon butter mm.
Mix it with pesto!
Yummy  Orzo meatballs: so so soft!
Came with 5 - they were tiny but a good appetizer!
Delicious!
Lemon spaghetti with shrimp: shrimp was HUGE!
Literally the size of a baby lobster.
So crunchy and so succulent!
Don't be fooled by the "lemon" because it was pretty salty!
But balanced perfectly with the shrimp.
Spaghetti cooked PERFECTLY!
Lobster ravioli: there was a tarragon flavor which I was not a fan of!
Flavor was just really citrus-y and not what I expected at all.
Skip this dish!

The BEST dining experience, ever.
I'm a huge fan of Giada and was giddy with excitement to eat here.
Everything was perfect, the food, the service, the view of the Bellagio fountains.
From the moment we walked in, we were greeted with warm welcomes from everyone we encountered.
We were visited by management twice throughout our dinner to see how we were doing.
Our waiter, Greg, gave us great recommendations and even steered us away from a few menu items.
The sommelier visited our table to assist with the wine selection.
Started with medium-sized Giada favorites antipasti - bacon wrapped dates, stuffed baby bells, veal crostini, pea pesto crostini, and caponata.
Even the bread basket was delicious!
Main course was the bucatini and the 28 oz bone in Tuscan ribeye.
Served with a side of crispy polenta and sweet corn with spicy sausage.
For dessert we had the trio of tiramisu.
Everything was delicious!
We ordered a lot of food for two people but wanted to try a bit of as much as we could.
It was an amazing experience and we will definitely be dining there again next time we're in Vegas.
Ask for a seat by the window to take in the views throughout your meal.

We had such a great experience here.
No complaints at all.
The food was great.
Service was excellent and we were fortunate enough to meet Giada herself!
The restaurant was truly beautiful.
The decor was so personal and modern.
It felt like sitting in her living room.
The views were spectacular as well.
You can catch the Bellagio fountain show from your dinner table.
The food was delicious.
It was the lightest and freshest Italian food I have ever had.
We ordered the spaghetti which was composed of handmade pasta, capers, and prawns in a light lemon olive oil sauce.
It was so refreshing and not oily at all.
We also ordered the frito misto which came with lemon aioli.
The seafood was fried to a crisp perfection.
The calamari salad we had was okay.
We also ordered a margherita pizzete.
It was so light and airy.
Giada's also offers a very delicious bread platter with a series of different spices and toppings complimentary with your meal.
It was great.
She also have us Italian Basil Lemonade on the house.
It was crisp and refreshing.
Overall, we had a great experience at Giada's.
Everything was perfect.
Congrats on being the first female chef on the Strip!

We ate here Sunday evening 6/22.
Fabulous decor, excellent service and the food - oh my goodness.
We had the salami/cheese platter to start - highest quality products.
The romaine salad had the BEST dressing I have had in literally years(along with fried capers).
Pizzette the perfect size, artichoke soup nice and light, lobster ravioli delicious & 28 ounce rib-eye just gorgeous.
The bread assortment was yum - the 4 year old asked for seconds.
Our team of service individuals were so kind - considering the 4 year old was being a tad of a handful.
We cannot wait to go back!
Also - the manager Avi was an absolute gem and truly genuine.
LOVE THIS PLACE.
Yes, I yelled that.
Go there you will not be disappointed.

All Across the Board - 5Stars!!!
A true foodie at heart - I was sooo excited for our dinner date!
I love Giada - watch her all the time and even make some of her recipes!
Hubby & I came here on June 21 2014 for a belated birthday celebration for him!
Upon arrival we were greeted w smiles & the staff was very attentive...  A very sweet young lady gave us a tour of the restaurant as we were waiting to be seated... you are greeted someone making homemade pasta... Yay!
The Open Concept of the restaurant is so fantastic - ask for a table by the terrace... that is where we sat.
You can enjoy a view of strip - close up ;-)  Gorgeous Restaurant setting!
There is a bar where you can enjoy a limited menu if you do not have a reservation... (sold out until mid July) The bar alone looks like a place we would like to hang out in the future - just for drinks / happy hour?
- the vibe was very inviting...  Now onto the food / service:  The server (Vincenzo) was well versed about the menu items - he gave recommendations to enhance our experience.
The quality of the food was tops!
She has a very vast menu w sooo many options...
The presentation of bread was very unique & yummy!
If you order salad they come out w this larger than life Pepper Grinder... loved it!
We decided on the Calde as our hot appetizer... delish!
We shared the Branzino & Bucatini as our main - I would suggest sharing if it is just two of you... you fill up on the yummy appos beforehand!
For dessert we sipped on the Nocciotella coffee & noshed on his birthday cake!
Yummm!!!
All the food was so delectable!
We will definitely come back so that we may decide on what is our favorites...  Do not forget to take your pic in the cute photo booth to make some memories...
Wonderful dining experience...
Memorable birthday for my baby!
your constant companion,  ~deirdra

Had an amazing experience and had Giada in person as a host.
She is not only beautiful but so extremely sweet!.
Food was out of this world!.
Dates and bacon a must!!!
Had the salmon, incredible and finished with a selection of gelato and coffee for a perfect evening!
Highly recommend this place

GREAT service!
Staff apologized for a mistake by moving us from the bar to a fantastic window by the table and covering our first round if drinks.
Customized the tasting menu for a lactose intolerant company.
Amazing food!
Bacon wrapped dates were to die for.
Sommelier was fantastic providing wine suggestions at different price levels.
Loved our experience and would definitely go back even if to just have antipasto at the bar!
Plus a signed autograph from Giada and recipes with the tasting menu!

As a foodie and a Vegas local, I am very critical of restaurants in general and especially customer service.
I cannot say enough great things about our waitress Brooke in the lounge and the medium size Calde antipasta platter we had on 6/24/2014.
I wanted to lick the pot the bread came in, all buttery and delicious and warm!
The chicken meatballs were amazing as were the lobster balls and the eggplant/potato pasta was a delicious treat!
I am a huge fan of citrus and loved the lemon undertones of just about everything on the sampler platter.
I was really impressed with the atmosphere and the food, but what makes my rating 5 stars was Brooke our waitress.
She was outstanding; funny, knowledgeable and just plain fun!
Shout out to Victor, Brooke's back waiter, who was also funny and attentive!
I am glad the restaurant was not all hoity toity which is what I feared, I will definitely be back!

The other reviews here are spot on, as the food and service are outstanding.
The Veal Chop Saltimbocca was flawless/perfect/worth-the-trip-in-itself, the Tuscan Rib-Eye is a jaw-dropping experience and will have you talking about the Flintstones, the pasta was excellent, and the various appetizers delicious.
The main dining room has a great vibe, and it's fun to watch Giada visiting tables and happily posing for photographs with fans.
The experience is perfect except for a couple of things;  First, and most significant, are the "pours" from the bar.
Cocktails are heavy on solids such as ice or olives but very light on fluids.
And wine by the glass comes in the smallest pours I've ever seen at an upscale restaurant.
For the prices the volume of liquor/wine in the drinks should be much more generous.
Second is the seating.
It seems the hostesses are adhering to old-school tactics in that if you want a decent table you need to tip them.
Otherwise you may very well get seated in the Siberia of tiny, cramped back alcove that's away from the fun atmosphere of the main dining room.
Not sure if Giada is aware of this practice...hope not.
The restaurant is packing in fans of the show, but to be successful in the long term it needs to develop a core base of regulars.
To do that they really need to improve on the bar, as that's a problem.
Overall a great new addition to the Vegas restaurant scene and, bar aside, right up there with our other favorites!

Complete let down, I can't believe that I waited 3 hours for a table.
Giada is my absolute favorite and was hoping for a knockout experience, but I left totally bummed.
Unlikely I will return but if I do it will be once they sort all the kinks out.

Ate here on 6/25, food was beyond great!
Service was excellent!
Well worth the price, would definitely come back anytime we are in Las Vegas.

Probably the best service I've ever had in Las Vegas.
Divine!
We started at the bar to kill time until our reservation.
Bar tender was super friendly, efficient and knowledgeable.
I had a great Negroni and my wife had a beautiful glass of champagne.
We had the lemon spaghetti with shrimp and the filet mignon with crispy polenta.
We also had the asparagus with lemon ricotta.
All the flavors were out of this world.
The portion size was perfect.
Wonderful food made with great passion.
Our bottle of chianti Classico was spot on, too.
If you want a great meal, DO NOT MISS this fine dining experience.

I had really high hopes and expectations for this restaurant, not because of Giada's celebrity status, but having been a fan of her on FN for years, and having used her recipes hundreds of times, I know this woman is legit.
And the experience, from start to finish, did not disappoint.
The restaurant décor is exactly what you'd imagine Giada's restaurant to look like.
It's beautiful.
The view is beautiful, the dining area is beautiful, the bar, ditto.
The one odd thing about the night were the number of hostesses huddled around the front of the restaurant.
I know it gets busy so when one leaves to escort diners to their table, another takes over, but it was a little mob-like.
Anyway, that is honestly the only off thing I felt the entire night.
The service was absolutely wonderful.
Our server, Jeff, could not have been more perfect.
The right balance of informative and helpful without being over bearing.
He suggested a sampler to start.
On our plate, we had the dates, bruschetta, and peppers.
The bruschetta was yummy.
The peppers were so fresh, it was as if they were freshly picked from a farmer's market that day.
The dates were out of this world!
My BF ordered the lobster ravioli for dinner.
The ravioli were generally stuffed with delicately spiced lobster.
I think he ate the entire plate in less than three minutes.
Seriously, it was that good.
I ordered the lemon spaghetti with shrimp.
This is honestly the most delicious thing I've ever eaten.
The shrimp were huge and perfectly cooked.
The pasta, so fresh.
The lemon sauce is absolutely divine.
And the sprinkle of fried capers on top, perfection.
The wine list was nice, not crazy big.
They had lots of options for wine by the glass.
The pours themselves, I thought, were on the large side and that's a GREAT thing.
Giada was everything I expected it to be.
I will definitely be back and would highly recommend!
Tip: if you want to try your hand at making the lemon spaghetti, foodandwine.com has Giada's recipe.
Everything down to the fried capers.
I made the dish two nights after dining at Giada's and, but for not having fresh pasta (still working on that), the recipe is spot on for what you get in the restaurant.
It was really, really good.
In fact, I'm making it again tonight :)

Outstanding food experience including the outstanding service by Radoslav, the Bulgarian service expert.
They need to work out a few kinks, but 6 stars would better describe the experience.
Guards actually sat with us for a few minutes!
Of course that's Giada that sat with us.

Small plates were fantastic but the entrees were not on the same level.
Restaurant had a great ambiance and was run very professionally.
I would recommend getting a bunch of small plates and sharing over getting individual appetizers.
The deconstructed artichoke soup was amazing (5/5).
Their complementary bread was worth being its own appetizer.
Order some burrata to put on top of it (4/5).
Bacon wrapped dates were flavorful but not the best dish we tried (3/5).
The charred octopus salad was fantastic (4/5) and the shrimp scampi was possibly the best dish we had (5/5).

Excellent - start to finish!

Immediately after walking in the front door,  I wanted to hate it here.
A crowd made up of soccer moms.
On their weekend hall pass.
Lining up just to get in the door.
Ghosted images of the food network burned into their retinas.
I had my doubts.
Sure,  it's a monument to narcissism.
Giada  (who I admittedly have no idea who she is or what she does) seems to be "the leader" to a throng of rabid followers.
Her image is plastered over every element of the space.
It's over the top and obscene.
So no, we didn't splurge for the autographed photo-menu of Giada.
But you have to give the place credit.
The room is absolutely beautiful.
In a town full of amazing interior design, it's truly a pinnacle of excellence.
Every item in the space is so well thought out.
Colors are magnificent.
Views are awesome.
Also, the food is truly fantastic.
Everything is fresh, well portioned and presented immaculately.
The pastas are particularly delicious and perfect for sharing.
The shining star here though is the service.
Our server for the evening, Radoslav, truly helped make our evening feel special.
He went above and beyond to add his wonderful warm personality to what would otherwise be an immensely impersonal restaurant.
All in all, a surprisingly good evening.

There is a LOT of gushing going on about this new place.
I luckily snagged a reservation 4 weeks in advance, but a quick search shows that the restaurant is sold out until August unless you want really inconvenient times.
Front of the house was a little awkward.
We got there a few minutes early, and they told us they were running on schedule but we'd have to wait until our reservation time.
No biggie, I thought.
I then watched 4-5 couples walk in after us and get seated before us.
Again, no biggie.
15 minutes after our scheduled time the hostess asks if we'd like to sit in the lounge while we wait for our table.
Now I'm getting annoyed.
What happened to running on time?
Luckily we didn't sit too long as they seated us after 10 minutes in the lounge.
I watched as they offered a tour of the place to their guests before they sat down.
Were we offered a tour?
I'll let you take a wild guess.
NOPE - I had to ask for one, and yes, we did receive a tour.
The space itself is gorgeous, with a great view of the strip.
There is a classic, traditional look with big, beautiful windows overlooking the Strip.
I loved the wood staircase going up to the restaurant.
Servers are in white jackets, with plating done tableside.
It is pretty elegant with kind of a homely feel.
I guess if you're gonna run episodes of Everyday Italian and Giada at Home on an endless loop on flatscreens above the bar, it better be Giada's place.
I mean, why the hell wouldn't she do that?
As we ate I was able to watch an easy-to-make peas and prosciutto dish.
So I got food and education!
The menu has phonetic pronunciations of all the pastas.
In case you're an idiot, they're right there for you.
Thanks, Giada.
Also, there are self-portraits of her all over the walls.
Not the endearing South Park portraits, however.
Our dishes were excellent.
Bread service was great, as the butter I thought I was spreading was actually mascarpone cheese.
The scallop and crab risotto was our favorite dish of the meal.
Bacon wrapped dates with spicy sausage and gorgonzola crema were also a big hit.
The cocktail program is well thought out and executed.
Giada stopped and chatted with us and took a pic after we finished our meal.
Very nice lady, and nice to see her buzzing around the place.
The tourists will come here in droves.
So food is good, decor and ambience even better, but something was just off with a few things.
I still think it was surprisingly a good experience.
As much as I thought I would dislike it, I enjoyed my meal there (despite a few hiccups).
And the food is quite noteworthy.
Giada is definitely off to a good start.

I've been torn about my review of Giada for a couple weeks now.
There were some HUGE highs and some MAJOR lows of my experience there.
I will appologize for the length of this review, in advance.
If someone from management reads this, I will be glad to discuss further.
I was traveling for work and having dinner by myself.
I stopped into Giada (2 weeks after opening) and asked how long the wait will be and if i could just find a spot at the bar.
The manager at the front of the house said that the bar was being used for overflow, and that the wait would be about 45 minutes to sit.
I agreed and went to play some blackjack at the Cromwell.
After about an hour, nobody called, so i went to check.
Upon arriving, the hostess said that I could be seated.
On my way to the seat (which ended up being at the bar), she offered to give me a tour of the restaurant.
She showed me the house made pasta, the kitchen, the bread, and other areas,  I was very excited to feast.
As I sat at the bar, i ordered a McClellan scotch.
The bartender then gave me an iPad menu.
As I was looking through the menu, i only saw Antipasto dishes.
I asked if I could see the complete menu, and was then told that only antipasto is available at the bar.
This was not explained to me, and I was even led to believe (due to the tour and conversation with the hostess) that the entire menu was available.
After looking at the menu for 15 minutes, I decided I would not eat there because I did not just want antipasto.
I asked for the check, but the bartender, Katie (who was amazing) asked me to please stay and said the would find the manager for me.
She also said that she would bring me out some antipasto dishes while I was waiting.
They brought out some big antipasto dishes, and I will admit that they were quite good.
There exceeded my expectations, and I was happy I stayed.
Finally as I was eating, the manager did come out.
He then went to the couple next to me, and asked them if everything was OK.
They said things were fine.
I knew he was supposed to ask me, but because I look young and was dressed in a T-shirt, I think he decided to ignore me.
The bartender then gesture to him that he was supposed to be talking to ME,  He then asked me if everything was OK.
I explained the situation to him, and told him I really wanted to try the food from the full menu.
I know that he has made this exception for people in the past from talking to the bartender (and that is why she called him), but he decided not to budge for me.
He gave me some BS excuse and I could tell he was just not being very genuine.
It honestly would have been better for the restaurant to just not even had him come see me.
He basically offered nothing and then left.
He said he would get me a free drink, that never game  So, why 3 stars?
The bartender, Katie, is AMAZING,  She made a terrible experience great.
If not for her, this would have been a 1 star review.
She is an asset to Giada.
She only charged me for the drinks I had and didn't charge for the food (since I didn't even want to order it).
Obviously, she got a large tip.
If the manager didn't come out, this would be a 4-5 star review.
The manager that came out was terrible.
He treated me with little respect and deserved to make this a 1 star review.
The management is a liability to Giada, and she should rethink who is running the customer facing team.
In addition, they should explain the the full menu is not offered at the bar.
I will go back to Giada, sit at a table, and try the full menu.
For now, this experience left me in the middle.

Upon arriving there, I was soooo excited...the decor and the view as well as the ambiance were just to die for!
But my main reason to go there was for what I thought was going to be great food and what a major disappointment that was.
I consider myself a big foodie and I have to say that the food/recipes just didn't work at all and the dishes that were "good" were just ok... We had no less than 12 dishes and they all kinda suck.
I think that it's really hard to mess up italian food if you are a chef but I guess it can be done after all.
Another thing that was really disappointing was the overwhelming menu.
Like I said, I'm a well-versed diner and that menu was waaaaaay too much.
Took me and my friend,  who is also well-versed in dining out, about 30 minutes to oder.
And we ended up going with a lot of their signature dishes/recommendations from the waitress and it wasn't good.
And for my last comment, the service was "too good" if you can call it that.
The personel was always at our table making it a bit difficult to carry a conversation.
I would love to give it another try later on if they change their menu but I would not spend my money on what's on that menu now.
I would only go for the ambiance, the view and the drinks!

I am so obsessed with this place.
I can't stop thinking & raving about it.
First, made reservations in May, knowing I was coming in July, and thank God i'm a planner because I hear they're booked til July although their bar and lounge area is first come, first serve.
Reservations at 7, arrived 10-15 minutes early and the kind hostess said we could take a pic in the photobooth (free!
) cool!
She then said our table was ready, gave us a tour (cool, being a cook myself), friendly staff working hard but still stopped to smile and say hello, welcome!
We went to our table and it wasnt ready but she assured us our new table would have an even better view (awesome!
5 minutes later it was a better view and worth the extra 5 mintues).
Our waiter Gregory.
What an asset to the Giada team.
Knowledgable, friendly, and made the best recommendations.
Thank you!
Drinks: complimentary tasty little drink from Giada, I wish I werent TOO excited to take in everything then I wouldve remembered what he said it was.
Delicious!
Thank you Giada.
Gregory recommended a cocktail that was seriously the most light, refreshing, perfect cocktail.
It was pink & pretty!
(Horrible with remembering the name)  Apps: stuffed dates for my meat eating friend.
She is a sausage, bacon, fan.
She said sausage was a little spicy but all together with the gorgozola cream, perfect.
I got the fritto misto..
Perfectly cooked calamari & shrimp!
Yum!
The bread could easily be an app that customers could pay for (hey!
I can appreciate a complimentary bread app, but I work in the food business, I understand food and labor cost).
The side seasoning tray that comes with the bread -- that marscapone lemon cream -- only Giada would think of that!
Yum!
The fried capers, I loved and put it in my salmon dish.
It was tasty!!
Entrees: my friend got the pasta e figioli and the corn and sausage side.
(She also ate the dates and she was stuffed) I don't eat meat so I couldn't taste any of it, but rave reviews and portion size great.
My pan seared salmon & summer succotash.
I was in heaven.
My favorite dish of all time.
What a great combination of flavors.
Salmon cooked perfectly (medium, thank you).
The edamame and corn was cooked perfectly, the worst is soft edamame, not this one-- perfect!
That whole grain mustard sauce, light and delicious.
I want to know what else is in that!
I'm sure I will have dreams of this dish until I can make my way back to Vegas to have it again.
Side of potatoes, Giada must know my love for potatoes well.
Smashed then fried, topped with parm and lemon zest -- fantastic!!!
Dessert: peanut butter and jelly tiramisu -- wow, just wow.
Light and airy cream, mellow PB flavor.
Amazingly delicious.
My second fave was the lime & blackberry.
Flavors are amazing together.
Polenta cake with strawberries.
Seriously, what's in that strawberry sauce?
I am not the biggest strawberry fan, but if someone put that in front of me, I would not turn down a bite.
I was expecting the polenta cake to be .. Hmm maybe grainy, dense?
But NO!
Light, airy, yum!!!!!
I also tried an espresso, nutella shot drink.
I am an espresso lover, that drink needs to be served in a latte cup cause that was just a tease :)  I can't wait til I can come back.
Sad Giada left the night before we had dinner, but so glad when the boss is away they still can keep everything up to par.
Amazing, thank you!!

This review is personally for Giada.
Upon arriving to Giada, I was met by at least 8 hostesses standing there all wearing the same maternal looking black dress and ill fitting heels.
Then we were met by eclectic decor and wrinkled table clothes.
Shortly after we were seated we were greeted by our waiter and another girl saying she would also be helping.
The waiter told us that all the appetizers and drinks were on the iPad.
Using an iPad cheapened the experience for me and the authenticity of the restaurant.
Just because restaurants are starting to implement iPads does not mean it works in a fine dining setting.
And to make things worse the iPad froze multiple times.
I also thought it was a little tacky when the waitress put the price fix menu on our table.
It's okay to suggest it but to have a whole folder that takes up half the table is too in your face especially on ones first visit.
We decided against the price fix until we knew the food was worth the price.
15 minutes after sitting down there was still no bread brought to our table so I requested some from our waiter.
He comes back with three different bread choices and a side of toppings.
I was surprised that the one topping I did not see was Parmesan.
The bread was very underwhelming but I did enjoy dipping the breadsticks into the pesto.
I ordered the caponata and the spaghetti with shrimp lemon and basil.
My dining partner ordered the bucatini for her main.
Before the caponata came our waiter said caponata is usually served with bread but Giada's is light enough to be eaten on its own.
While the caponata was not heavy it was still a little much eating it on its own.
The spaghetti I ordered was solid even though it could have used a little more seasoning.
The shrimp was some of the largest I have scene however it was sitting in what seemed to be a small puddle of blood and this turned me off.
I tried my friends bucatini and ending up like hers more and she liked mine more so we traded.
The bucatini pasta was well cooked but the sauce was undeveloped.
We ordered the cookies to go for dessert and they were great.
My favorite was the palmier.

Living up to the hype.
A warm and contemporary Italian American eatery that delivers great tastes with the energy that is Vegas.
This is not an authentic taste of Italian regional specialties rather refined and prettied up versions of Italian American favorites.
All good, it works.
The majority of the menu centers around small plates of antipasti shared family style.
Flavors are very complimentary so ordering a wide variety of dishes works.
An incredible simple grilled broccoli rabe natural bitterness is enhanced by hints of char and smoke but brought to life by a spicy, chili vinaigrette.
Sweet peppers stuffed with a tangy goat cheese and peppery olive oil create a very well balanced dish exploding with freshness.
For seafood antipasti, do not pass on the lobster arancini.
Dressed with a spicy pomodoro of Calabria chili and a touch of a herbaceous basil aioli that elevates the sweetness of the lobster.
Slightly cloying mouth feel but great flavors.
Great selection of well made salumi.
Try a variety.
The Bresaola and finocchiona as good as any in Tuscany.
Add a selection of cheeses with perfectly paired condiments (Mozzarella with a citrus chili pesto,  Parmigiano with honey).
Small selection of pastas.
The lobster ravioli excellent.
Perfectly cooked sheets of pasta surrounding chunks of barely cooked through lobster perfumed by tarragon.
Richness on richness but it works.
The only weakness of the restaurant are the mains.
A mustard, walnut, and raisin crusted rack of lamb, while perfectly cooked was one dimensional, needing more herbaceous, lemony gremolata.
A bone in "Tuscan" rib-eye topped with a sunny side up egg did not make sense.
The yolk did nothing to elevate the flavor of the beef rather giving it an unpleasant yolky aftertaste as it cooled.
Service is a work in progress.
Slow and lacking confidence.
This will definitely improve with time.
Decent wine list at Vegas resort prices.
Guys, admit it, Giada turned you on to cooking shows.
Now the chance is here to try the food you know you never cooked.
Worthy.

Very solid.
Some dishes were fabulous others were standard.
Service was attentive and caring, while sometimes long-winded.
Appropriate for an Italian restaurant I suppose.
The view of the strip is a plus, as is the decor.
Appropriately priced.

Everything expected in a fine dining atmosphere (e.g., portion size, price,  service,  presentation, ambience).
A few small niggles could be corrected.

Love this place.
The food was great.
Can't wait to go back.
The must try are the antipasti.
Our table had bacon wrap dates, salami meat, lobster ravioli and grilled octopus.
Did not love the iPad.
I was more comfortable with the Menu.
The iPad was kinda confusing.
Next time I will totally skip the iPad and ask for the menu.
Thank you Joseph for helping us with the menu.

OUTSTANDING !!!!!
Exquisite decor: elegant yet warm and inviting Antipasti presentation fresh and mouth watering Service amazing: professional yet warm and knowledgeable: Kudos to Jason, server Bart, back server,Theresa, sommelier and Avi, manager We were on a budget and told Theresa what our price limits were: she brought us a Northern Italian Pinot Grigio which was crisp, buttery and dry...Fabulous...especially for the price The food presentation was attractive and loaded with taste The antipasti was an interesting combo: each item with a distinctive taste Pastas were TENDER...with simple delicious sauces EVERYTHING LIGHT...and FLAVORFUL !!!!!!!
Tiramisus were simply flavored...light..... a perfect end to a delightful meal The decaf was full bodied..and very flavorful..too good to be decaf (If I can't sleep tonight, I'll send an addenda tomorrow) All in all, Giada lived up to its hype...EVEN BETTER...because I expected the prices to be higher  IT IS NOT A RIP OFF JOINT JUST THE OPPOSITE !!!!!!!

This was a hard to get reservation because of Giada's popularity but it was well worth it!
First off, the staff was energetic and well educated on everything Giada's has to offer.
We were given a brief tour of the place first and then taken to our seats.
Our server was amazing.
He was fun and informative and offered suggestions.
EVERYTHING On the menu looked and sounded AMAZING!!
Unfortunately it's going to take 5 visits to be able to try it all!!
I can say the bacon wrapped dates and orzo meatballs were fabulous starters and the rigatoni with vegetable bolognese was incredible for a pasta!
We did also try the trio of tiramisu and the plate of cookies, both delicious and a great finish to the meal.
Giada's has knocked it out of the park.
She was even there working the line and came out to greet customers!!
Amazing evening and I cannot wait to go back.

The view is breathtaking, the service is impeccable, and the food is delicious.
I was extremely impressed with the design and detail of the menu.
I hope to visit again soon.
Anytime you get up from your seat, your seating area is quickly cleaned and a fresh napkin is promptly laid out for your return.
You'll never had to wait on refills, they are constantly making sure that their guests feel at home.

We tried Giada as some friends had gone and enjoyed it.
I must say we were very disappointed.
First off, the good points: The Service; it was outstanding from start to finish.
The bacon wrapped dates were excellent.
Now the rest: we were a party of 4 and were seated at a large round table meant for 6 so it was difficult to carry on conversation.
The music was too loud, the whole restaurant was too loud IMHO and then to top it off, they opened up several of the garage door style windows so we could hear all the traffic noise on Flamingo.
They don't have proper blinds and drapes to block out the sun which was setting so 2 people at our table were "in the spotlight".
It was so bright you couldn't see and when we asked them to close the drapes to block the sun we were told they don't work that way but they are "aware of the problem".
The wine was very good but like everything else, way overpriced.
We live in Vegas and we know the strip places are more expensive but the roasted chicken for 2 with 2 sides (everything is a la carte) came to $74.
C'mon....this is chicken....actually it was more the size of a Cornish hen!
The asparagus side was tough and stringy and luke warm.
With one appetizer, the meal for 2, 2 glasses of wine, tax & tip it was $150 and, in our opinion, definitely NOT worth it.
Giada is just another overpriced strip restaurant charging more for the name and location, certainly not the food.
We will not go back and will not recommend it to others.

Loved the decor of this place.
Located in the Crowell you go up the escalator and are greeted by the hostess desk.
Light wood and modern decor are used throughout the restaurant which makes it feels like you're in her home.
The plates are pretty with a rose gold G on them.
A big bread basket comes out with warm focaccia, breadsticks and flatbread.
We started off with olives with many different kinda and sizes along with the mini pizzette.
I loved the size and taste of the pizzette so that you could get a taste and not be too full for the main.
We both got the spaghetti that came with huge shrimp.
Everything was delicious and up to par!

My husband & I went to Giada's for dinner.
The hostess was very friendly, she did ask my husband to remove his hat because of the dress code.
We were walked past a few prep stations that was nice but we didn't really think it was necessary if they wanted that part of the restaurant to be the forefront they should have placed it more towards the middle of the restaurant.
When I made the reservation I requested a window seat but we were seated in a corner facing the bar.
Our waiter Rocco was great, very friendly & knowledgeable about the menu.
The drinks were very over priced so we just ordered one, the Destroyer was $18.00 it was good but we didn't not order another one.
The menu has several options for appetizers & small plates much like tapas.
We ordered the chicken Marsala meatballs & the strawberry & tomato jam crostini.
Both were delicious but very small portions, just 5 meatballs for $14.00 and 4 crostini's for $11.00.
The menu didn't have as many options as I was hoping for as I don't eat fish or red meat.
I ordered the arugula salad with candied lemon & pancetta.
I think there were 4 tiny pieces of pancetta and just a few pieces of lemon.
The price for the salad was $14.00.
My husband ordered the spaghetti with shrimp, the shrimp were very large and he said it was a good meal, the cost was $28.00.
We also ordered the lemon potatoes for $8.00 and they were good as well.
As we were eating we noticed the dress code was not fully enforced.
Several people were wearing jeans & I noticed a girl wearing very short shorts & a tank top.
The atmosphere is very warm & relaxing.
I was hoping the food would be more centered around Giada's cooking show.
I was hoping to see pork chops, & few more vegetarian dishes.
We also passed on dessert as they are the standard at every other restaurant.
Gelato, cookies, etc.
I guess for Vegas the prices were inline with other restaurants.
We won't go back again due to the prices, limited menu options and small portions.

I wish I took home some of the leftovers from last nights dinner.
The lobster ravioli (my favorite), lemon pasta with shrimp & the rosemary pot bread.....
So good!!!
Heard they're opening for lunch soon.
I'll be back!
Oh...
The view oh the view!
They have great 2 tops up against the window.
By far the perfect place for date night.

This place is off to a great start considering how ambitious the menu is, how large the dining room is, and how absolutely slammed busy it is every second it is open.
The only issues we had were with pacing--all of our smaller plates came out in a hurry, then there was a loooooooooong wait for the final larger plates.
Well, there was also a minor issue with the staff not knowing which of the coffees were and were not available in decaf.
The place was full, but we were seated immediately upon arriving for our 7:45 reservation.
The room is arranged comfortably and even though it's busy, the tables are far enough apart that there's a busy hum without being too loud.
I think you would probably have to be right on the windows to have much Bellagio fountain view, but it was also very pleasant to watch the crescent moon rise over Caesars from our table.
The bread service is excellent, with crunchy breadsticks, a flatbread, and a life-changing rosemary focaccia.
It also comes with multiple condiments, like pink Himalayan salt, chili pepper flakes, lemon ricotta and basil pesto.
(We actually used the condiments throughout our meal, which was fun.
)  For the small plates, we had the oyster crudo, the charred octopus, the chicken marsala meatballs and some of the reggiano cheese.
Every one was excellent except the octopus, which was tough in some bites and could have used a bit more seasoning.
(But maybe the bar had just been set impossibly high the previous night, when I had the best octopus I've ever eaten at, surprisingly, CarneVino.
) The chicken marsala meatballs displaced the albondigas at Julian Serrano for me as the best meatballs in Vegas.
If they had been any more moist, they would not have been able to hold their shape and they burst with flavor.
For the larger dishes, we had the lemon spaghetti (with shrimp as big as lobster tails) and the branzino with tangerine glaze.
They were both wonderful.
We were so full we decided to forego dessert.
Lots of thought has obviously gone into the menu, as there is a wide range of dishes and every plate is beautifully presented on dishware that looks like it was selected to suit the individual dish.
Service throughout was smooth and attentive (I think they would rather die than let a water glass be empty) and quite knowledgeable about the menu except for the decaf issue.
Overall, I do plan to go back next time I'm in Vegas.
The menu is set up (and priced) so that you can sample a variety of items without breaking the bank.
For two people, we had cocktails (love the iPad cocktail menu with pictures), wine, four smaller plates and two larger plates and with tax and tip it was $252.
I consider that perfectly reasonable for an event restaurant of this quality in this location.

Went here on the opening weekend, and everything seemed to be going off without a hitch!
Reservations are required; my girlfriend made ours months in advance due to the grand opening.
While waiting for the table, we took pictures at the photo booth which was cool.
When the hostess sat us, she gave us a mini tour of the prep areas where they make the hand made pasta, marinated olives, pizza, focaccia, etc.
Everything is fresh and looks amazing!
We had a seat near the opened window, overlooking the strip and the Bellagio fountain.
Our server was very personable and knowledgeable, I'd expect nothing less.
He brought us probably the best tasting focaccia I've ever had, and we ordered the sausage stuffed dates as an appetizer; also amazing.
Perfect combination of salty, sweet and spicy.
For the entrée, I ordered the branzino and my girlfriend had the spring pea and panceta tortellini.
The branzino was perfectly cooked, and the citrus sauce and arugula salad made it very refreshing.
The tortellini was fantastic, and I'm not one that likes peas.
Finally, desert came and I wasn't expecting much.
We ordered the tiramisu which came in layered shot glasses.
My Nonna makes great tiramisu, so I had high expectations.
There were three flavors: pb&j, chocolate and blackberry lime.
All three were delicious, but pb&j was the best!
We ordered mochas as well, extremely decadent and garnished with Giada's signature "g" in chocolate.
A pretty heavy desert but well worth it.
Overall, just a great experience in terms of food and service.
Giada even came to our table and talked with us for a little.
Gotta say, it was pretty unforgettable, will definitely be going back!

Ok so this is so past due for me to do a review as I'm a regular here now.
This place from the very start has far exceeded my expectations of how a celebrity chef restaurant should be.
The decor and furnishing is very elegant, trendy but a hip vibe.
Food quality, taste, and presentation is what you would expect of a 5 star quality restaurant and presented as masterpieces of  art worthy of any food magazine photos.
The atmosphere is very open especially with the open balcony windows.
Main thing that keeps a regular foodie like myself coming to high end establishments like this would be the friendliness and accommodating staff.
As you come off the escalators to the restaurant you are warmly greeted by beautiful hostesses who would welcome you to Giada's and give you a tour of the restaurant starting from the antipasta bar to the fire ovens to the bar and throughout the dining area.
Giada has said she designed the restaurant to give her guests a feeling of being invited into her own home.
She may not always be there but the gorgeous hostesses certainly do a great job in welcoming you.
FYI Giada is there often at times and when she is she does take the time to walk around and mingle and talk to guests, take photos and such.
I had the pleasure of meeting her the night before my birthday.
Bartenders and other staff are very firefly and outgoing.
My second visit there the staff had already remembered my name what I drank and ate and more about me.
To me service like that is reason enough to become a weekly regular.
They are also very knowledgable about your menu items both food and drink menu.
My favorite bartender would be Kate the stunning blonde bartender from ASU in Phoenix (yes I do get to know the staff too lol) my second visit I was warmly greeted by Avi the manager really an awesome guy too get to know him!!
As I conclude writing this review I am now getting in the mood to go there right now!!

So I'm not gonna lie, I'm a little biased, I love her.
She is my favorite chef on Food Network.
I was excited to try this place, at first I planned to wait a few months and let all the hype die down, but when my friend scored us a 7p reservation, I changed my mind pretty quickly.
When we arrived, we waited way passed our reservation time, only to find out Giada was in the house, so people were staying longer at their tables.
As soon as we walked in, she was there taking pics with people on their way out.
We were started with a tour of the restaurant and the prep area, which was fun to see.
Our table could not have been in a better spot.
Perfect view of the Strip and the Bellagio Fountains.
Greeted immediately by our waiter who gave us a quick rundown of the iPad cocktail menu, we all started out with a signature cocktail.
Something different for everyone, and every single person enjoyed their drinks.
I tried the Destroyer, Clase Azul Tequila Reposado, tangerine, orange and basil, basil ice sphere, as well as the La Strada, Campari, homemade lemon sorbeto, Bertagnolli Limoncello, Proseco, and (don't judge) Barbarella, Tanqueray #10, orange spice ginger beer, fresh lemon, basil foam (this was my favorite).
I was excited to see they offered a tasting menu but to my disappointment, we were informed the way they have their tasting menu set up is a family style, so everyone at the table is required to order the tasting menu.
So we went with the original plan of ordering something different for everyone to try.
We started our with their amazing bread basket, I was more obsessed with the condiments that it came with, the lemon butter and the dried capers with my favorite.
Onto the apps, we couldn't decide so we ordered multiple.
The large appetizer platter was big enough for 5 people and it had a little but of everything.
I had picked the Oysters Crudo, which were fantastic, the Burrata, amazing, Lobster Arancini, best Arancini I have had.
I could have stopped at the apps and been happy.
I originally had planned to get the Lemon Spaghetti, but then I wanted the Branzino, so our waiter told me to order the Branzino and I could have the Spaghetti as a side.
Perfect!
This dish was executed to perfection.
I love Seabass, this had a perfect char on the skin, and the Lemon Spaghetti is as good as everyone says.
The shrimp was as big as my palm.
My friends Rack of Lamb was my favorite.
I would order this next time.
The Ribeye was cooked perfectly too.
TONS of sides!
Ravioli, Crispy Polenta, Asparagus, and Lemon Potatoes.
Next up, the dessert tray.
I was so full by the time this came around, but we still indulged.
She has some really unique desserts.
Service was excellent, our server was very attentive, as well as everyone else that helped him out.
Highlight of my night, she came around to the table and spoke with us about our meal.
She was so personable and nice, upon leaving, I was able to take a picture with her.
Totally made my night.

First off, there isn't a restaurant in the world that is trying harder!
From the hostess that bumped somebody over so we could sit at the bar, to the manager who came over and introduced himself, to the bartender Chris who wickedly and seamlessly substituted the vodka redbull that I originally ordered for the vodka concoction he prepared in its place, to the expediter that explained the salt and chili accompaniment to the bread, service and attention to detail off the charts.
Now the food.
We only sampled giadas favorite platter, a $50.00 sampling of sweet peppers, stuffed dates, and the antipasto assortment of calamari, ahi crostini, etc., and while nothing was bad, nothing really crushed it for us either.
The bread presentation is a lot of sizzle and less steak, even with the fresh rosemary bread they bake in a ramekin.
Probably not fair to rate a restaurant on one appetizer plate but this was all we ordered.
I was really struck by the attention to detail everywhere.
Servers looking at glasses to see if they needed polishing, bartenders wiping off the side of the glass because a bit of foam trickled down, etc..They have assembled a terrific team, and this is obviously not the case of a celebrity chef just stamping their name on the front door, but a labor of love by an obvious perfectionist who has invested a bunch of blood, sweat, and tears and isnt about to let someone else screw it up.

The food was not the issue and neither were the drinks.
The food itself wasn't anything mind blowing, but it was good.
The veal I ordered came out cold.
The server was informative and very polite.
My biggest complaint is that our actual entrees came out at the 2 hour mark.
With only two people at our table, we were expecting to be finished with dinner in about 2 hours.
So if I had not boxed up that veal and instead stayed to eat and enjoy dessert, I'd have been looking at a 3 hour dinner.
A bottle of wine didn't come out for about 30 minutes, the appetizers came out quickly, but we were left sitting for an hour before I finally ask for my entree, which came out in another 15 minutes.
For fairly average food, I don't think I'd wait that long again.
Instead, Il Mulino across the street not only tastes better, but actually serves food at a reasonable pace.

I would love to give this place at least 4 stars but there were a couple of problems that are hard to overlook.
I am a huge fan of Giada's and booked her restaurant 2 months ago, so looking forward to a great meal.
The hostesses were great and did honor the request for a window table, but it was half an hour after the reservation time.
No biggie because the room is comfortable and the view was fantastic.
The waiter was very good and tried his best to push the tasting menu, but we already knew what we wanted.
Here is the breakdown of dishes.
Lobster Arancini- 8  Very good... red sauce was the best part.
Shrimp Scampi- 8  Marscapone made this dish, but shrimp seemed of a lesser quality.
Polenta cake was perfect.
Artchoke Soup- 10  What an amazing soup, great taste and texture.
Pasta Fagiole- 10  My partner loved it.
Lobster Ravioli-10  This was too delicious to describe, perfect dish.
Rack of Lamb- 3  The pictures on Yelp make this dish look great, but our lamb was incredibly fatty.
The waiter said it was because it was Colorado lamb and I felt intimidated not to send it back.
Never again; there were only 4 tiny bites out of the whole dish.
The spinach served with it was delicious, though.
The worst part of it was the half hour wait between the soup course and the FAT of the Lamb course.
Way too long of a wait.
The server did say a couple of times that it would be right up, but never apologized for the wait.
That lamb dish was $45 for nothing...
I want my money back!
Overall it was a decent experience, but not worth $240.
The bottles of wine start in the $50 range and go up from there.
There should be more reasonably priced options, especially in the Italian categories... been to Italy several times and even good wines are a bargain.
They are trying to hype this restaurant as more casual dining as if you were having dinner in someones home.
Somewhat pricey for a home cooked meal.
Probably would not return for dinner, but might try lunch sometime if Giada has some amazing paninis on the menu.
One more item of interest- We saw tank-tops, tee shirts, tennis shoes, shorts, midriffs, sandals and every other type of dress here.
Not sure there is a dress code.

Great experience!
This restaurant is beautiful inside and the attention to detail is evident in every aspect of the meal including the bread selection and awesome cocktails.
We had the tasting menu for $120 each.
This included a take home menu, recipes, and signed picture of Giada.
The following is included in the tasting menu: a small plate of antipasti (my only complaint is that it was too small), a pasta course, main course and then a free shot at the dessert cart.
My party made full use of the dessert cart and tried many of the offerings.
The dessert cart guys were very cool and encouraged us to try as much as we wanted.
The cart had a huge selection of 4 ice cream, 4-5 cookies, a few tarts, 3 parfaits, and 3 cakes plus a few things I am probably forgetting.
We got about 10 items off the cart and the highlights were the peanut butter and jelly parfait, peanut butter and chocolate cookie, and lemon ricotta cookie.
I am going on and on about the dessert, but the pasta and salmon we had was also very good.
I really want to go back and I hope they open for lunch soon!
The highlight of the night was that Giada was there!
She was very gracious and stopped for a moment so we could take pictures with her on her way out to catch a plane.
It is good to see that she is very involved in the success of the restaurant over a month after they opened.
It definitely shows in the quality of the food.

I was skeptical that this place would be good since it's a celebrity chef's restaurant and they have disappointed me in the past.
Boy was I surprised.
It was hard at first getting a reservation.
We had called months ahead of time and they said it was all full but we can try the day of.
The the day of rolls around and we walk in only to be turned away as both tables and the bar were full.
So we call the next day, still no luck but the girl on the phone said she would squeeze us in the next day.
The day comes and they couldn't find our reservation.
But they still took us.
Awesome.
We got a mini tour of the restaurant and were seated with a great view of the strip.
So far so good.
The services was freaking amazing.
The waiter was very attentive and personable.
The recommendations he made was great.
He brought us complimentary toast sized spritzers.
(It was delicious) We never had to ask for more water as the cups seemed to fill themselves.
When we got up to use the restroom, our napkins mysteriously folded themselves.
(I later saw that a waiter had taken away the used one and replaced it with a brand new, folded one) The manager came by a couple of times to check on us.
Overall, the service is what I would want from all "fancy" restaurants.
Now on to the food.
I went with a party that liked to eat, so us 4 girls spent $280 on dinner.
We ordered 3 antipasti dishes, 1 salad, 4 entrees and 1 side.
The appetizers were really good, we got the calamari, mushroom pizza, and broccoli rabe.
The breads were very interesting (in a good way) and the lemon butter was the devil.
I just wanted to eat the butter by itself and lick the bowl clean.
I forgot what salad we got but it had arugula and parm cheese and it was delicious.
For the main course, we got the 28 oz.
ribeye (complete with sunny side up egg), the rigatoni, salmon, and the risotto with the side order of lemon potatoes.
The waiter recommended trying the balsamic vinegar with the ribeye, which I was hesitant to try at first, but was very glad I did as it was amazing.
Everything else was fantastic as well.
I only wish we had room for dessert.
We spied it on other people's tables and it was in these cute little cups.
We made full use of the photo booth.
:)  I can't wait to try more of the menu the next time.
This restaurant is now on the top of my list for vegas.

I had made a reservation through my hotel only to find out when I arrived that the Sunday I thought was booked was actually 2 weeks later!
This was by no means the fault of Giada's, rather my hotel but when I explained to the hostess what had happened, she was very understanding and empathetic and did her best to at least get us in for a look and quick tasting!
I was highly motivated to visit primarily because my 3 daughters, 6 year old twins and a 7 year old, have gotten me hooked on Giadas show.
They are avid fan and with all the great places to eat in Vegas, it had special meaning to experience it for them.
While I only had time to enjoy a mixed appetizer plate and dessert, I found both to be exquisitely presented in a wonderfully enjoyable and comfortable atmosphere which certainly captured California casual with an elegant Italian experience.
The bacon wrapped dates were incredible, all of the food was amazingly tasteful and light while certainly satisfying.
We also tried 4 of the deserts, each wonderful and I dont think we could have gone wrong with any of the choices.
I would like to add that while Giadas entire experience was enjoyable, there are plenty of wonderful restaurants happy to take your money.
What was truly as notable as the food however were the people and especially, the Manager, Avi.
Even as busy as this newly opened place is, he made it his personal mission to great every guest and sincerely wanted to insure we had a wonderful experience, even though we werent really "officially" there for the entire course.
A final thank you also to Avi in that after I had explained the details of our visit and evening, he personally insured I had a great story, and more, to share with my daughters.
Now really, who does that any more?!
Thank you Avi and Giada's.
I look forward to returning soon and staying for the entire experience.

5 stars for food 4 stars for service  The boyfriend and I went to the bar since we were 15 minutes early for our reso and were advised by the lovely hostesses our table would be ready closer to the reso time.
The bar is packed, even at 10pm which they also advised in advance.
Found a spot on the end.
Two bartenders helped us, Robert and Chris I think.
Both gave awesome service & so personable.
We enjoyed our cocktails very much!
We got a window table which I was very excited about.
The view of Ceasars Palace :) It took a while to get menus.
Our server, Jessie I think it was.
Female with dark hair brought the wine list first.
Everything on the menu looked amazing but my stomach couldnt handle one of each thing.
We ordered the Chicken Marsala Meatballs to start.
Amazing!
VERY small order so dont be surprised.
I think there were only 4 bite size pieces.
We didnt get the complimentary bread before the appetizer so I had to ask for it.
Presentation was impressive.
I enjoyed the lemon butter with the Rosemary Olive Oil bread.
We were brought St. Germain compliments of Giada.
That was a nice touch & it was good!
Not too floral.
I enjoyed just sipping on it.
We ordered Iced Tea's with the Raspberry Essence the same time we ordered the app and entrees and didnt get it until we were in the middle of our entree's after I asked for it.
Instead of an apology, our server quickly left the table and yelled at her busser.
The Iced Tea service is very impressive I must say.
Comes with a glass straw!
One order comes with two full glasses and are not refillable.
I had the famous Spaghetti which was delish!
Those prawns are huge!
The boyfriend had the Salmon with succotash, yummy!!!!
And a side of lemon potatoes.
Never in my mind would think to put those two together but it just worked.
We were both getting full but I was not about to pass up dessert because I really wanted gelato!
The beautiful dessert cart came by & of course everything looked wonderful but I already planned on getting gelato so we got one of each flavor, White Coffee & Toasted Banana.
OMG!
Best gelato ever!
Both were amazing, I dont know which one I enjoyed more.
The server brings the check & it comes with an Itouch servey.
The bf fills it out cause we def had comments to make!
When she comes back from swiping the card she then mentions our anniversary.
Kinda late dont you think!
As we were standing up she brings an anniversary drink.
It was a basil infused sparkling lemonade.
A lil sour & too sweet for me but good.
I wish she brought that before we were leaving cause I had to sit back down to drink it.
Avi was the front manager for the night & as we were first getting seated he introduced himself.
During our meal he came by again to shake both our hands & asked if everything was ok.
I wanted to mention all the things our server missed but he came by when I had a mouth full of food.
He was very nice & im impressed he went to every table & introduced himself.
That is quality service.
The service from our server only could have been better but I will definitley be back.
The food is just outstanding.
Im a fan of her show & Giada is my favorite Food Network star so of course I was excited she opened a restaurant here.
I can def see her personality in the design of the room.
Its large, so open & clean.

The  atmosphere of this place is amazing!
The view is also spectacular.
I went in with my wife and a couple friends around 6pm on a monday night.
The food is all really good.
Bacon wrapped dates was fire.
The bone in rib eye was ok a little bit too oily and sauce was a tad bit salty.
I think this place is fairly hyped up and it would remind me of a brunch spot or a Italian tapas kind of place.

As soon as you walk in you are greater by not on,y the friendliest staff but Giada also greater us during our dinner to make sure we were enjoying ourselves.
The food was fresh and delicious!
I would definitely come back.

My 2nd visit proved to live up to my 1st.
Truly unparalleled hospitality from each crew member from the hostesses, each staff member as you walk to your table & the waiter.
A real Welcome To My Home, Let Me show You Around & Feed You My Best Dishes experience.
Among all the antipasti platter choices my favorite is Giada's.
Although I think I might ask to sub the pesto crostini for something else.
Among the pasta selections the Lobster Ravioli is still my favorite but now I'll also add the Bucatini to that list.
For dessert the Polenta Cake, Strawberry Tart & Chocolate Chip cookie were worth the calories.
Tomorrow I will give the new lunch service a try.......
Safe to say I won't be weighing myself this week

My friends and I visited Las Vegas for the first time the week of 6/30 through 7/7.
We decided that Saturday night we would enjoy a fine dining experience and then see what the nightlife had to offer.
We got dressed and headed out to the strip sometime around 7PM.
After debating on where to eat we settled on Giada (she is my partner and I's favorite chef after all!).
We were all dressed in appropriate attire, however at the reception desk we were treated as though we had walked in wearing flip-flops and tattered shorts.
We made our way up the escalator and I approached the desk.
A young dirty-blonde haired woman greeted me and I stated that I had a party of 6 and we wished to have dinner.
She started to say "Oh I"m sorry but we..."  At that moment another blonde haired woman (slightly older) literally nudged her with her elbow and said "be nice".
She then preceded to ask me if I would perhaps like to see the menu before we were seated.
Essentially she was insinuating that we obviously could not afford a meal there and looked the part to boot.
I was infuriated, however being the opposite of what hey assumed I was I played along and agreed to see the menu.
We were then whisked away on a tour of the kitchen area and finally seated.
The drink menu was very unique (based on Giada's father's favorite films), I had a Hannibal which was great and my partner had the Barbarella (his favorite film) which was equally refreshing.
We ordered Giada's favorites and calamari for the table as the antipasto, spaghetti and tortellini for the pasta and shared the porterhouse steak with a side of polenta.
The food was amazing just as we expected, however the treatment by the staff left a sour taste in our mouths.
There were other patrons sitting near us wearing shorts and t-shirts whom I am sure were not treated as we were.
The main reason in my opinion is because we mostly looked Hispanic unlike the fairer skinned individuals who were poorly dressed.
While the food was amazing, we will not be visiting Giada again.
I myself have experienced true Italian hospitality, unfortunately it was nowhere to be found at Giada.

STOP!
Unless you are prepared to spend your entire paycheck at this joint, stop reading now.
You'll only torture yourself.
Now that we have that out of the way, if you're still reading (and hopefully eating soon), you are in for an amazing experience.
We had a few drinks at the bar while we waited to be seated for our 10 p.m. reservation.
That's right.
10 p.m. and we booked that a month and a half out.
This place is popular.
Service was flawless, both at the bar and at our table.
Our dinner was overseen by Joseph Gordon Levitt, aka Gregory.
A+!
He knows the menu and flavors like it's his job.
Oh, wait.
Any way, he did a fantastic job of making recommendations and even suggested the order of how our choices should be served.
Truly outstanding server.
We started with oysters crudo, oysters rockefeller, Vitello Tonnato crostini, bacon-wrapped dates.
I've been around the block when it comes to bacon-wrapped dates and these were amazing.
I also really loved the oysters crudo.
Probably the only dish I would not reorder was the crostini.
Next we had our pasta course and shared the lemon spaghetti and buscatini.
Both were phenomenal, the sweet and tart of the lemon spaghetti contrasted nicely with the spiciness of the buscatini.
Both were incredible, but I think if I had either as my entire meal, I would not have been satisfied.
Just not a big pasta eater.
Gregory's recommendation to do a pasta course and then a main course was a great one.
For our main course, we shared the 28 oz ribeye and chicken cacciatore.
The presentation of the chicken was mind-blowing.
The staff presents the whole chicken with its "fixings" and then it's returned to the chef to be carved and brought back to your table in all of its glory.
The steak was very well-prepared, well-seasoned and the argula and fried egg were the perfect touches.
I can't even talk about our dessert course.
I was in a coma by that point.
The dining room is still working out a few kinks.
I am one of those people who believe that if you have a reservation, your ass better be in a chair no later than 5 minutes past and we waited over a half hour past our reservation.
Everything was so wonderful, I can forgive a little tardiness.
This place is a foodie's wet dream.
Love, love, love.
Giada had the night off, so I am cashing in my retirement to return and meet the dynamo behind this mecca.

Something inside of me didn't want to like this restaurant but I just do I love it.
First my friends tried to make a reservation on OpenTable and there was nothing open for over eight weeks.
So I said why not call them I called them and I was able to get a reservation for the evening we wanted but not until 830.
They called me to confirm the reservation the day of and the only change I made is I said there will be six of us instead of five of us and the person on the phone said that was fine.
We got there at 7:30 to enjoy a drink in the bar.
We were turned away saying the bar was full and to please come back at our reservation time.
So we went to bound.
See my review on bound.
When we came back the hostess very unkindly told us that our reservation was at five not 830.
That's when I started to get a little angry.
It was just about this time that a manager came over apologize profusely told us to hang out for a few minutes and she would get us one of the best seats in the house.
My gosh from that point on it was a completely perfect dining experience.
There was a dessert cart right there where we were waiting and there were two people manning the dessert cart and they were very happy to tell us about all of the desserts.
When we got our table we were asked if we would like a tour of Giadas kitchen which we took.
When we sat down at our table the view was absolutely breathtaking.
When I made the reservation they asked if there was any special events we were celebrating.
I said we were celebrating several birthdays including my own.
The first thing they did was bring us a complimentary St. Germain cocktail which was absolutely delicious absolutely unexpected and absolutely appreciated.
The service was absolutely impeccable.
We started with the large Caldi platter and the Salumi and cheese platter.
Her menu is broken up into small plates and a traditional Italian course meal.
On the Caldi platter you could get some of her best small plates.
We had two different kinds of meatballs calamari shrimp scampi eggplant Rollitini fried zucchini and lobster Arancini balls everything was amazing.
However we sort of wanted to have entrées too so we ordered the Rissoto with scallops and the tortellini and the pitzetti.
It was all fabulous.
However I would be aware that these dishes are also very small so if youre hungry get a caldi platter also!!!
It's really worth it!
Then the dessert cart rolled around again they took so much attention to details they had written happy birthday in chocolate on our dessert plates.
Everything on the dessert cart is six dollars but the best deal in the house is you can try five desserts for $14 which is what we did obviously.
We sort of made fun of one of the dessert and so the dessert waiter gave one to us for free just to try it or Maybe because he thought we were funny.
Either way it was a perfect way to end the meal.
Looking around this restaurant is just beautiful you can see the picture of our view that I posted but the attention to detail is amazing.
My favorite thing is her light fixtures say I eat a little bit of everything but not a lot of anything which I think sums up her menu perfectly.
I will go back again and again and again and I truly hope this attention to detail this service and the amazingness of the food is in it for the long-haul and not just because it's a new restaurant.

The Décor of the restaurant is very nice.
The hostess gave us a brief tour of the restaurant.
We were a party of two and were seated by the West facing windows at 6pm.
The shades were down but they staff could not lower them all the way.
It was ok but slightly warm.
the servers and server assistants provided us great service.
The GM, Laurent came by and greeted us.
The drinks were just ok. Quite expensive.
One was $18.00 and one was $15.00.
I than ordered an Anejo on the rocks.
$19.00.
That's really high for Patron brand Anejo even in Las Vegas.
We had clams casino, not traditional but tasty.
We also had the Charred Octopus.
It was good.
Next was the tricolore salad.
It was very good.
Our main course was the Spaghetti with shrimp.
Huge shrimp, but the shrimp were over cooked.
The pasta was a bit dry.
Needed a bid more sauce.
We also ordered the Salmon.
I ordered it medium, it came out over cooked and dry.
The coffee and grappa were great.
The PB&J mousse was too warm and very ordinary.
I wish I ordered the Polenta cake.
The dessert guys told us the mousse was the pick.
All and all, just average.
We spent $260.00 with tax and tip.
The service at the tables around us was really slow.
We were the there for 1 hour and 45 minutes.
the tables next to us had just received their entrees when we were leaving.
They arrived just 10 minutes after us at the latest.
They did not seem happy and sat with no food in front of them for an hour.
It seemed like there were many tables like this.
So we had very good service and very average food with a pretty high price point.
Its all about price value perception when your rating restaurants.
Unfortunately a celebrity chef has their own big shoes to fill.
Especially when they are rating other peoples cooking on TV.
Average is the rating!

